Montana, session 2025, LC4294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 23-2-541, MCA, is amended to read:
"23-2-541. Aquatic invasive species prevention pass for nonresident vessels -- rulemaking. (1)
In order for a motorized vessel exempt from registration in Montana pursuant to 61-3-321 or a nonmotorized
vessel owned by a nonresident to launch on the waters of this state, the operator must possess an aquatic
invasive species prevention pass purchased for the vessel, available for inspection either in physical form or as
an electronic copy at the request of a warden, another officer, or an employee of the department. The pass
must include a description of the vessel for which it was purchased.
(2) (a) The annual fee for an aquatic invasive species prevention pass purchased pursuant to this
section is:
(i) $10 for a nonmotorized vessel; and
(ii) $30 $35 for a motorized vessel.
(b) The pass expires at the end of each calendar year and is not transferable between vessels.
(3) Fees collected pursuant to this section must be deposited in the invasive species account
established in 80-7-1004.
(4) The department may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
(5) The provisions of this section do not apply to a motorized vessel owned or controlled by the
United States or any state, county, city, special district as defined in 18-8-202, or tribal government or to a
motorized vessel that meets the description of property exempt from taxation under 15-6-201(1)(d), (1)(n), or
(1)(o) or 15-6-215.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC4294.1
(6) For the purposes of this section, the term "nonmotorized vessel" includes catamarans, drift
boats, kayaks, rafts, and sailboats."

Section 2. Section 87-2-130, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-2-130. Aquatic invasive species prevention pass. (1) Except as provided in 87-2-803(6), to be
eligible to fish in Montana or to apply for a fishing license or a combination license that includes a fishing
license, a person who is 16 years of age or older must first obtain an aquatic invasive species prevention pass
as provided in this section. The pass must be purchased once each license year.
(2) Resident aquatic invasive species prevention passes may be purchased for a fee of $2 $2.50.
(3) Nonresident aquatic invasive species prevention passes may be purchased for a fee of $7.50."

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective March 1, 2026.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****